Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1559.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-6054, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-6054. Powers of district A. This state recognizes the special expertise of the districts in the fields of land, soil, water and natural resources management within the boundaries of the district.  A district is empowered to: 1. Conduct surveys, investigations and research relating to the character of the soil, soil erosion prevention within a farm or ranch, methods of cultivation, farm and range practices, seeding, eradicating noxious growths and invasive vegetation and any other measures that will aid farm and range operations, disseminate information and educate landowners pertaining thereto, and carry on research programs with or without the cooperation of this state or its agencies or the United States or its agencies. 2. Create and administer a soil health program that promotes implementation of soil health practices, research projects, demonstration projects, educational projects or other activities appropriate to promote the continuing capacity for soil to function as a vital living biological system that sustains plants, animals and humans, increased soil organic matter, improved soil structure, water-holding and nutrient-holding capacity or nutrient cycling. 3. Conduct demonstration projects within the district on lands owned or controlled by the state or any of its agencies with the consent and cooperation of the agency having jurisdiction of the land, and on any other lands within the district on obtaining the consent of the landowner or the necessary rights or interests in the land, in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods and measures by which water, soil and soil resources may be conserved and soil erosion and soil washing may be prevented and controlled. 4. Cooperate, coordinate and enter into agreements with a landowner, an operator or any agency or subdivision of the state or federal government to carry on programs of watershed improvement, soil erosion prevention, methods of cultivation, cropping practices, land leveling and improvement on agricultural lands, and programs limited to methods of proper range land use, reseeding and eradicating noxious growth and invasive vegetation on grazing lands, all within the limits of an individual farm or ranch and subject to the conditions the supervisors deem necessary. 5. Acquire, by purchase, exchange, lease or otherwise, any property, real or personal, or rights or interest in any property, maintain, administer and improve any properties acquired, receive income from any property or right or interest in property and expend it in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any property or interest in property in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. 6. Make available, on the terms it prescribes to landowners within the district, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seed and other material or equipment as will assist the landowners to carry on operations on their lands for the purposes and programs authorized by this chapter. 7. Develop, publish and bring to the attention of landowners within the district comprehensive plans for conserving soil and water resources within the district that specify in such detail as may be feasible the acts, procedures, performances and avoidances necessary or desirable to effect the plans. 8. Apply for, receive and spend monies from the Arizona water protection fund pursuant to title 45, chapter 12 to be used in individual districts or in cooperation with other districts, persons, cities, towns, counties, special districts and Indian communities for projects consistent with title 45, chapter 12. 9. Employ agents, engineers, attorneys or other employees not readily available from existing state agencies. 10. Sue and be sued in the name of the district, have a seal, which shall be judicially noticed, have perpetual succession unless terminated as provided in this chapter, make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to exercise its powers and make, amend and repeal rules not inconsistent with this chapter to effect its purposes and powers. 11. Apply for grants and accept donations, gifts and contributions in monies, services, materials or otherwise, and use or expend them in carrying on its operations. 12. Organize and establish an education center to increase the knowledge of natural resources in this state through the following methods: (a) Offering technical guidance and training to agricultural producers. (b) Publishing scholarly materials. (c) Providing educational and training opportunities, both inside and outside of the district. (d) Conducting or sponsoring scientific studies that affect natural resources in this state. (e) Increasing public awareness of water conservation statewide, including water conservation methods and best management practices. (f) Increasing public awareness of soil health practices statewide. 13. Apply for, receive and spend monies from the water infrastructure finance authority of Arizona pursuant to title 49, chapter 8 to be used in individual districts or in cooperation with other districts and cities, towns, counties, special districts, Indian communities and other persons for projects consistent with title 49, chapter 8. 14. Conduct surveys, investigations and research relating to the health of groundwater in the district's groundwater basin. 15. Assist rural groundwater management work groups established pursuant to section 45-580.01 as follows: (a) If there is more than one district in each rural groundwater management work group, the districts shall coordinate their support of the rural groundwater management work group. (b) Hold at least one joint meeting with the members of the rural groundwater management work group. If there are multiple districts that share jurisdiction with a rural groundwater management group, the districts may hold a joint meeting. (c) On or before December 31 of each year, the districts shall submit a report to the department of water resources of their findings and recommendations of their collaboration with rural groundwater management work groups. B. A provision of law with respect to acquiring, operating or disposing of property by other public bodies is not applicable to a district organized under this chapter unless specifically stated therein. C. After the formation of any district under this chapter, all participation thereunder shall be voluntary, notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary. D. A district may send to the board and the Arizona water protection fund commission established by title 45, chapter 12 written recommendations for geographic areas to be emphasized, issues of concern and measures to implement title 45, chapter 12. A district that sends written recommendations to the commission shall request information from at least the following: 1. The director of the department of water resources and the board. 2. The federal and state fish, wildlife, recreation and natural resource agencies. 3. County and municipal entities. 4. The public. E. The district shall develop procedures to ensure adequate participation in the public involvement process prescribed by subsection D of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 45, chapter 2, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 45-580.01, to read: START_STATUTE45-580.01. Rural groundwater management work groups; members; consolidated report A. A rural groundwater management work group shall be established in each groundwater basin.  The natural resource conservation district board and soil and water conservation district that are located in each groundwater basin shall appoint work group members. each work group shall contain affected parties and local experts, including agricultural producers. B. If a groundwater basin contains one or more natural resource conservation districts or soil and water conservation districts, the districts shall cooperate to ensure that the rural groundwater management work group contains a representative sample of each district consistent with the percentage of the groundwater basin that is located in each district. C. Rural groundwater management work group members serve without compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2. D. The department shall provide each rural groundwater management work group with administrative support as requested by the work group. E. On or before december 31 of each year, each rural groundwater management work group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations for changes in rural groundwater management to the department.  The department shall consolidate the reports and provide the consolidated report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of the consolidated report to the secretary of state.END_STATUTE